North Carolina statutes. Chapter 62A. Public Safety Telephone Service and Wireless Telephone Service.
Article 1. Public Safety Telephone Service. [Repealed]

§§ 62A-1 through 62A-12.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-383, s. 2(a), effective January 1, 2008.

Cross References.

For present comparable provisions, see G.S. 143B-1400 et seq.

§§ 62A-13 through 62A-20.

Reserved for future codification purposes.